Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 124.201, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. Notwithstanding section 124.204, subsection 4, a drug that contains the pharmaceutical composition of crystalline polymorph psilocybin, also known as COMP 360, or any other trade name approved by the United States food and drug administration, shall be immediately removed from schedule I under section 124.204, subsection 4, paragraph âsâ , upon its approval by the United States food and drug administration and rescheduled based upon the recommendations of the United States food and drug administration and its listing in the federal Controlled Substances Act, 21 U.S.C. Â§812, and 21 C.F.R. Â§1308.14. b. Immediately upon the rescheduling of the drug under paragraph âaâ , it shall be lawful to prescribe, distribute, and market the pharmaceutical composition of crystalline polymorph House File 383, p. 2 psilocybin, also known as COMP 360, or any other trade name approved by the United States food and drug administration. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 383, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor